Maine, session 132, LD1517.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §1466, sub-§9, as amended by PL 2013, c. 461, §1, is further
amended to read:
9. Required vote. Before the municipality may withdraw from the regional school
unit, the withdrawal agreement must be approved by a majority vote of those casting valid
votes in the municipality, and the total number of votes cast for and against withdrawal at
the municipal vote must equal or exceed 50% 25% of the total number of votes cast in the
municipality for Governor at the last gubernatorial election.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §1466, sub-§13, as amended by PL 2013, c. 461, §6, is further
amended to read:
13. Determination of results; execution of agreement. Except for a school
administrative district that was reformulated as a regional school unit pursuant to Public
Law 2007, chapter 240, Part XXXX, section 36, subsection 12, as amended by Public Law
2007, chapter 668, section 48, if the commissioner finds that a majority of the voters voting
on the article has voted in the affirmative and the total number of votes cast for and against
the article equal or exceed 50% 25% of the total number of votes cast in the municipality
for Governor at the last gubernatorial election, the commissioner shall notify the municipal
officers and the regional school unit board to take steps for the withdrawal in accordance
with the terms of the agreement for withdrawal. For a municipality that is part of a school
administrative district that was reformulated as a regional school unit pursuant to Public
Law 2007, chapter 240, Part XXXX, section 36, subsection 12, as amended by Public Law
2007, chapter 668, section 48, if the commissioner finds that at least 2/3 of the votes validly
cast in the municipality are in the affirmative, the commissioner shall notify the municipal
officers and the regional school unit board to take steps for the withdrawal in accordance
with the terms of the agreement for withdrawal.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §1704, sub-§2, ¶C, as amended by PL 2001, c. 375, §5, is
further amended to read:
C. Municipal approval must be in the same manner as the original formula was adopted
when the community school district was formed, except that, if the proposed change is
an alternative cost-sharing plan under subsection 1, paragraph E, the change must be
approved by a majority of voters voting in a referendum in each municipality. The
total vote cast in favor of the referendum in each of the member municipalities must
be at least 20% exceed 10% of the number of votes cast in each of the member
municipalities in the last gubernatorial election.
Sec. 4. 20-A MRSA §15693, sub-§3, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 2, Pt. D, §62
and affected by §§72 and 74 and c. 12, Pt. WW, §18, is amended to read:
A. Except as provided in subsection 4, the budget format is that prescribed by a
majority of the school board until an article prescribing the school budget format is
approved by a majority of voters in an election in which the total vote is at least 20%
number of votes in favor exceeds 10% of the number of votes cast in the municipality
in the last gubernatorial election, or 200 100, whichever is less.
Sec. 5. 20-A MRSA §15693, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 2, Pt. D, §62 and
affected by §§72 and 74 and c. 12, Pt. WW, §18, is amended to read:
Page 1 - 132LR1837(01)

4. Budget format; town or city charter. In a municipality where the responsibility
for final adoption of the school budget is vested by municipal charter in a council, the
school budget format may be changed through amendment of the charter under the home
rule procedures of Title 30‑A, chapter 111, except that the amendment must be approved
by a majority of voters in an election in which the total vote is at least 20% number of votes
in favor exceeds 10% of the number of votes cast in the municipality in the last
gubernatorial election.
Sec. 6. 30-A MRSA §125, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2007, c. 321, §1, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) All bonds issued by the county commissioners for the purposes of this section
must be approved by a majority vote of the county budget committee or county
advisory budget committee. All bonds must be approved prior to issuance by the
voters of the county by referendum vote in accordance with section 938, except
that a referendum for this purpose may be conducted at any regular or special
county election at which the total number of votes cast for and against the proposed
bond issue is equal to at least 50% exceeds 25% of the total number of votes cast
in the county for all gubernatorial candidates in the most recent gubernatorial
election.
Sec. 7. 30-A MRSA §2105, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 737, Pt. A, §2 and
Pt. C, §106 and amended by PL 1989, c. 6; c. 9, §2; and c. 104, Pt. C, §§8 and 10, is further
amended to read:
4. Effective date. If a majority of the ballots cast on any question under subsection 1
or 2 favor acceptance, the new charter, charter revision, charter modification or charter
amendment becomes effective as provided in this subsection, provided as long as the total
number of votes cast for and against the question equals or exceeds 30% 15% of the total
votes cast in the municipality at the last gubernatorial election.
A. Except as provided in subparagraph (1), new charters, charter revisions or charter
modifications adopted by the voters take effect on the first day of the next succeeding
municipal year.
(1) New charters, charter revisions or charter modifications take effect
immediately for the purpose of conducting any elections required by the new
provisions.
B. Charter amendments adopted by the voters take effect on the date determined by
the municipal officers, but not later than the first day of the next municipal year.
Sec. 8. 30-A MRSA §2526, sub-§5, ¶A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 275, §28, is
further amended to read:
A. A town may determine at a meeting of its legislative body held at least 90 days
before the annual meeting whether a single assessor will be appointed under
subparagraph (3) or a board of 3, 5 or 7 will be elected and the term of office of the
assessor or assessors. In towns where the municipal legislative body is the town
meeting, the determination is effective only if the total number of votes cast for and
against the determination equals or exceeds 10% 5% of the number of votes cast in the
town at the last gubernatorial election.
Page 2 - 132LR1837(01)

(1) Once a determination has been made, it stands until revoked at a meeting held
at least 90 days before the annual meeting.
(2) If a town fails to fix the number, 3 shall be elected. If a town fails to fix the
term, it is for one year.
(3) When a town has chosen a single assessor under this paragraph, the select
board shall appoint the assessor for a term not exceeding 5 years.
Sec. 9. 30-A MRSA §5102, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 737, Pt. A, §2 and
Pt. C, §106 and amended by PL 1989, c. 6; c. 9, §2; and c. 104, Pt. C, §§8 and 10, is further
amended to read:
3. Favorable vote. If a majority of the ballots cast on this question favor acceptance,
this law becomes effective immediately upon declaration of the vote by the municipal
officers, provided as long as the total number of votes cast for and against the acceptance
of the Act equals or exceeds 20% 10% of the total votes cast in the municipality for all
candidates for Governor at the last gubernatorial election.
Sec. 10. 30-A MRSA §5404, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2011, c. 255, §10, is
further amended to read:
A. Revenue bonds of a town, as distinguished from a city, may not be issued until the
general purpose for which the bonds are to be issued and the maximum principal
amount of the bonds to be authorized have been approved by ballot by a majority of
the votes cast on the question. The total number of votes cast for the bond must be
equal to at least 20% exceed 10% of the total vote for all candidates for Governor cast
in the municipality at the last gubernatorial election. The ballot submitted to the voters
of a town to authorize the issuance of revenue bonds must state the general purpose for
which the proposed bonds are to be issued and the maximum principal amount of the
proposed bonds authorized to be issued. The voting at meetings held in towns must be
held and conducted in accordance with sections 2528 to 2531‑B, even if the town has
not accepted the provisions of section 2528.
Sec. 11. 30-A MRSA §7209, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 1989, c. 216, §2, is amended
to read:
2. Requirements for approval. The voters shall indicate their opinion on this
question by a cross or check mark placed against the word "Yes" or "No." Before becoming
effective, the deorganization must be approved by at least 2/3 of the voters voting in the
general election and the total number of votes cast for and against deorganization at the
election must equal or exceed 50% 1/3 of the total number of votes cast in the municipality
for Governor at the last gubernatorial election.
Sec. 12. 35-A MRSA §3903, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 141, Pt. A, §6, is
amended to read:
4. Favorable vote. If a majority of the legal votes cast on this question favor
incorporation, a municipal power district may be created for that municipality under this
chapter upon declaration of the vote by the municipal officers, provided that as long as the
total number of votes cast for and against the incorporation equals or exceeds 40% 20% of
the total votes cast in that municipality for all candidates for Governor at the previous
gubernatorial election. If not, the proposed district is not created at that time. Upon
Page 3 - 132LR1837(01)

414 certification of a favorable vote by the municipal officers, the commission shall approve
425 formation of the district if the commission finds that formation would be in conformance
436 with the requirements of this Title. Upon approval by the commission, the district is created
447 and the commission shall file certification of that approval with the Secretary of State.
Sec. 13. 35-A MRSA §3904, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 141, Pt. A, §6, is
amended to read:
4. Favorable vote. If, in each municipality, a majority of the legal votes cast on this
question favor incorporation, a municipal power district may be created for those
municipalities under this chapter upon declaration of the vote of the municipal officers,
provided that as long as the total number of votes cast in each municipality for and against
the incorporation equals or exceeds 40% 20% of the total votes cast in the municipality for
all candidates for Governor at the previous gubernatorial election. Upon certification of a
favorable vote by the municipal officers, the commission shall approve formation of the
district if the commission finds that formation would be in conformance with the
requirements of this Title. Upon approval by the commission, the district is created and
the commission shall file certification of that approval with the Secretary of State.
Sec. 14. 38 MRSA §1101, sub-§1-A, as enacted by PL 1981, c. 466, §2, is amended
by amending the 2nd blocked paragraph to read:
If the referendum question is approved by a majority of the legal voters voting at the
election, provided that as long as the total number of votes cast for and against the
referendum question equaled or exceeded 20% 10% of the total number of votes cast in the
proposed district in the last gubernatorial election, the municipal officers representing the
residents of the proposed sanitary district shall file an application for that proposed district
in accordance with subsection 1.
Sec. 15. 38 MRSA §2002, sub-§2, as amended by PL 1993, c. 721, Pt. E, §3 and
affected by Pt. H, §1, is further amended by amending the 2nd blocked paragraph to read:
If the referendum question is approved by a majority of the legal voters voting at the
election, provided that as long as the total number of votes cast for and against the
referendum question equals or exceeds 20% 10% of the total number of votes cast in the
proposed district in the last gubernatorial election, the municipal officers representing the
residents of the proposed watershed district shall file a statement of intent to form the
proposed district in accordance with subsection 1.